tables/en-GB-g1-nocaps.utb
noback always ' 3
word 'ave 3-1-1236-15
word ’ave 3-1-1236-15
midendword 'an 3-1-1345
midendword ’an 3-1-1345
endword 'ah 3-1-125
endword ’ah 3-1-125
midendword 'am 3-1-134
midendword ’am 3-1-134
word c'mon 14-3-134-135-1345
word c’mon 14-3-134-135-1345
endword 'd 3-145
endword ’d 3-145
begword d' 145-3
begword d’ 145-3
word 'em 3-15-134
word ’em 3-15-134
word 'ear 3-15-1-1235
word ’ear 3-15-1-1235
midendword e'e 15-3-15
midendword e’e 15-3-15
word goin' 1245-135-24-1345-3
word goin’ 1245-135-24-1345-3
begword ha'p 125-1-3-1234
begword ha’p 125-1-3-1234
endword 'll 3-123-123
endword ’ll 3-123-123
endword 'm 3-134
endword ’m 3-134
endword 'n 3-1345
endword ’n 3-1345
begword o'd 135-3-145
begword o’d 135-3-145
begword o'l 135-3-123
begword o’l 135-3-123
word 'ome 3-135-134-15
word ’ome 3-135-134-15
endword 're 3-1235-15
endword ’re 3-1235-15
endword 'ry 3-1235-13456
endword ’ry 3-1235-13456
endword 'r 3-1235
endword ’r 3-1235
endword 's 3-234
endword ’s 3-234
endword 't 3-2345
endword ’t 3-2345
word 'tis =
word 'twas =
word 'uns 3-136-1345-234
word ’uns 3-136-1345-234
endword 've 3-1236-15
endword ’ve 3-1236-15
midnum , 3
noback always , 2
midnum . 2
#decpoint . 2 # removed to sort out translations such as p.11
noback always . 256
noback always ; 23
midnum : 3456
noback always : 25
#endnum ! 6-235
noback always ! 235
begnum # 4
always # 4-3456
midnum / 456-34-3456
always / 456-34
always // 345
noback always ? 236
endnum % 0-25-1234
always % 25-1234
midnum ^ 346-3456
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 0-56-236-3456
always * 35-35
repeated *** 35-35-0-35-35-0-35-35
noback always ( 2356
prepunc ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
begword ( 2356
endword ) 2356
always [ 6-2356
always ] 2356-3
always { 46-2356
always } 46-2356
always -com 36-14-135-134
endword -to 36-2345-135 pointed-to resource
endword -by 36-12-13456 used-by
# always _ 78
prepunc `` 236
postpunc ` 6-236
prepunc ` 6-236
postpunc ’ 356-3 end single curly quote
prepunc ’ 356-3
always ‘ 6-236 start single curly quote
noback always ` 4
begword @ 4-2346
noback always @ 2346
always \\ 5-16
always | 5-123
repeated \x00a0 0 no break space
repeated --- 36-36-36

# repeated ___ 78-78-78
repeated ___ 46-46-46

repeated ::: 25-25-25

repeated === 56-2356-56-2356-56-2356
repeated ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156
always \s-\s 36-36
always \s-\scom 36-36-14-135-134
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .
# always  \x2026 3-3-3 # 8230			MS Word smart ellipsis

# the hyphen
always \s–\s 36-36
#always - 36
repeated ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36
midword - 36
joinword - 36
begword - 36
hyphen - 36



# mathematical symbols
#decpoint . 2 # removed to sort out translations such as p.11
noback always < 246
joinword = 56-2356
joinnum = 56-2356
noback always > 135
midnum + 0-56-235-3456
begnum + 56-235
joinnum + 56-235
joinword + 56-235
midnum - 36-3456 removed for verse references
midnum \x2013 36
#always - 36
joinnum × 56-236
joinword × 56-236
midnum ÷ 0-56-256-3456 division sign
joinnum ÷ 56-256
joinword ÷ 56-256
begnum £ 123
always £ 4-123 pounds

# other special characters
always © 45-14 copyright
sign ™ 45-2345 trademark
sign ® 45-1235 registered
always ¶ 1234-345 paragraph
always § 234-3 section
noback always ° 356 degrees
begnum $ 256
always $ 4-256
always ¢ 4-14 cents
sign € 4-15	euro
always € 4-15	euro
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 2-134 mu

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
literal .doc
compbrl .xml
compbrl .xsl
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt
literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav
literal .tar
literal .zip
literal .uk

# include countries.cti

# Problems handled with context
#context _$l["."]$l @256 U.S.
noback context _$d["a"] @56-1
noback context _$d["A"] @56-1
#corrects Capital A's after a number ending up with letter sign AFTER Caps sign
noback pass2 @6-56 @56-6
include braille-patterns.cti
# Remove space between word and italic signs
noback pass2 [@0-46-3]   @46@3
noback pass2 [@46@0]   @46
#pass2 \s+  \s
noback pass2 [@345-0-0]  @345@0
noback pass2 [@345-0-0-0]  @345@0
